Illinois, session 104th, SB1795.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Responsible Outdoor Lighting Control Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 200/15)7    Sec. 15. Outdoor lighting control. All new luminaires 8purchased with State funds after the effective date of this 9Act or installed after the effective date of this Act on a 10structure or land that is owned and managed by the Department 11of Natural Resources or the Department of Transportation, 12including roadways, facilities, properties, nonhabitable 13structures, monuments, and public right-of-way spaces, 14including sidewalks, with the intended purpose of outdoor 15illumination must follow the following outdoor lighting 16control requirements: 17        (1) Permanent outdoor luminaires must be fully 18    shielded with an IES BUG rating and produce less than 1% of 19    its emitted light above 80 degrees from the downward 20    vertical direction of nadir. Light should not be emitted 21    at an angle above 60 degrees from the downward vertical 22    direction of nadir. 23        (2) Luminaires must avoid light trespass by not   SB1795- 2 -LRB104 10332 BDA 20406 b1    exceeding an illuminance of one lux as measured at ground 2    level both horizontally and vertically at the property 3    boundary. 4        (3) Luminaires must have a correlated color 5    temperature less than or equal to 2,700 Kelvin. In 6    residential areas, dark sky locations, or environmentally 7    sensitive areas, such as State parks and outdoor 8    recreation facilities, correlated color temperature should 9    be no more than 2,200 Kelvin. 10        (4) Outdoor lighting must be minimized to no more than 11    25% above ANSI/IES standards or United States Department 12    of Transportation recommendations. 13        (5) Facade lighting must be minimized to no more than 14    25% above ANSI/IES standards, must project downward, and 15    must not violate the light trespass limits in paragraph 16    (2). 17        (6) When the installation or replacement of roadway 18    lighting is planned, the appropriate authority must 19    determine whether reflective roadway markings or 20    reflective signage is appropriate and safe for the 21    situation in lieu of outdoor lighting. Reflectorized 22    roadway markings, lines, warning signs, informational 23    signs or other passive means must be used for roadway 24    lighting, except at intersections of 2 or more streets or 25    highways, unless it is determined that adequate safety 26    cannot be achieved by reflective means.   SB1795- 3 -LRB104 10332 BDA 20406 b1        (7) No artificial lighting above one lux, as measured 2    at ground level both horizontally and vertically, may 3    trespass onto land or waterways designated or managed as 4    habitat, reserve, natural area, open space, or wilderness. 5(Source: P.A. 103-1007, eff. 1-1-25.)